Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Children’s Proceedings.
Sec. 47.10.093.
Disclosure of agency records.

Except as permitted in AS

47.10.092

, (b) — (g) and (i) — (l) of this section, and AS

47.17.030(g)

, all information and social records pertaining to a child who is subject to this chapter or AS 47.17 prepared by or in the possession of a federal, state, or municipal agency or employee in the discharge of the agency’s or employee’s official duty are privileged and may not be disclosed directly or indirectly to anyone without a court order.

A state or municipal agency or employee shall disclose appropriate confidential information regarding a case to

a guardian ad litem appointed by the court;

a person or an agency requested by the department or the child’s legal custodian to provide consultation or services for a child who is subject to the jurisdiction of the court under AS

47.10.010

as necessary to enable the provision of the consultation or services;

an out-of-home care provider as necessary to enable the out-of-home care provider to provide appropriate care to the child, to protect the safety of the child, and to protect the safety and property of family members and visitors of the out-of-home care provider;

a school official as necessary to enable the school to provide appropriate counseling and support services to a child who is the subject of the case, to protect the safety of the child, and to protect the safety of school students and staff;

a governmental agency as necessary to obtain that agency’s assistance for the department in its investigation or to obtain physical custody of a child;

a law enforcement agency of this state or another jurisdiction as necessary for the protection of any child or for actions by that agency to protect the public safety;

a member of a multidisciplinary child protection team created under AS

47.14.300

as necessary for the performance of the member’s duties;

the state medical examiner under AS 12.65 as necessary for the performance of the duties of the state medical examiner;

a person who has made a report of harm as required by AS

47.17.020

to inform the person that the investigation was completed and of action taken to protect the child who was the subject of the report;

the child support services agency established in AS

25.27.010

as necessary to establish and collect child support for a child who is a child in need of aid under this chapter;

a parent, guardian, or caregiver of a child or an entity responsible for ensuring the safety of children as necessary to protect the safety of a child;

a review panel, including a variance committee established under AS

47.05.360

, established by the department for the purpose of reviewing the actions taken by the department in a specific case;

the University of Alaska under the Alaska higher education savings program for children established under AS

47.14.400

, but only to the extent that the information is necessary to support the program and only if the information released is maintained as a confidential record by the University of Alaska;

a child placement agency licensed under AS 47.32 as necessary to provide services for a child who is the subject of the case;

a state or municipal agency of this state or another jurisdiction that is responsible for delinquent minors, as may be necessary for the administration of services, protection, rehabilitation, or supervision of a child or for actions by the agency to protect the public safety; however, a court may review an objection made to a disclosure under this paragraph; the person objecting to the disclosure bears the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that disclosure is not in the child’s best interest; and

a sibling of a child who is the subject of the case to allow the siblings to contact each other if it is in the best interests of the child to maintain contact; in this paragraph, “sibling” means an adult or minor who is related to the child who is the subject of the case by blood, adoption, or marriage as a child of one or both of the parents of the child who is the subject of the case; a sibling who is adopted by a person other than the parent of the child who is the subject of the case remains a sibling of the child.

A state or municipal law enforcement agency shall disclose information regarding a case that is needed by the person or agency charged with making a preliminary investigation for the information of the court under AS

47.10.020

.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996.]

The department may release to a person with a legitimate interest confidential information relating to children not subject to the jurisdiction of the court under AS

47.10.010

.

The department and affected law enforcement agencies shall work with school districts and private schools to develop procedures for the disclosure of confidential information to a school official under (b)(4) of this section. The procedures must provide a method for informing the principal or the principal’s designee of the school that the student attends as soon as it is reasonably practicable.

[Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996.]

The commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee or the commissioner of administration or the commissioner’s designee, as appropriate, may disclose to the public, upon request, confidential information, as set out in (j) of this section, when

the parent or guardian of a child who is the subject of one or more reports of harm under AS 47.17 has made a public disclosure concerning the department’s involvement with the family;

the alleged perpetrator named in one or more reports of harm under AS 47.17 has been charged with a crime concerning the alleged abuse or neglect; or

abuse or neglect has resulted in the fatality or near fatality of a child who is the subject of one or more reports of harm under AS 47.17.

The department may publicly disclose information pertaining to a child or an alleged perpetrator named in a report of harm described under (i) of this section, or pertaining to a household member of the child or the alleged perpetrator, if the information relates to a determination, if any, made by the department regarding the nature and validity of a report of harm under AS 47.17 or to the department’s activities arising from the department’s investigation of the report. The commissioner or the commissioner’s designee

shall withhold disclosure of the child’s name, picture, or other information that would readily lead to the identification of the child if the department determines that the disclosure would be contrary to the best interests of the child, the child’s siblings, or other children in the child’s household; or

after consultation with a prosecuting attorney, shall withhold disclosure of information that would reasonably be expected to interfere with a criminal investigation or proceeding or a criminal defendant’s right to a fair trial in a criminal proceeding.

Except for a disclosure made under (i) of this section, a person to whom disclosure is made under this section may not disclose confidential information about the child or the child’s family to a person not authorized to receive it.

The Department of Health and Social Services and the Department of Administration shall adopt regulations to implement and interpret the duties of the respective department under this section, including regulations governing the release of confidential information and identifying a sufficient legitimate interest under (f) of this section.

A person may not bring an action for damages against the state, the commissioner, or the commissioner’s designee based on the disclosure or nondisclosure of information under (i) of this section except for civil damages resulting from gross negligence or reckless or intentional misconduct.

A person who discloses confidential information in violation of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

In this section, “school” means a public or private elementary or secondary school.

History.

(§ 13 ch 113 SLA 1994; am §§ 1, 2 ch 32 SLA 1995; am §§ 32 — 34, 55 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 94 SLA 1997; am § 36 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 69 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 31 ch 99 SLA 2004; am §§ 22 — 27 ch 64 SLA 2005; am §§ 5, 6 ch 20 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 58 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 2012; am § 15 ch 69 SLA 2018; am §§ 11, 12 ch 15 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

A reference to “AS

47.10.092

” was inserted in (a) of this section in 1994 to harmonize the amendments to AS 47.10 made by ch. 98, SLA 1994, and ch. 113, SLA 1994.

Subsections (g) and former (h) were enacted as (h) and (i), respectively. Relettered in 1995, at which time former subsection (g) was relettered as (i) and the internal reference in (a) was conformed.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in (b) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Subsections (i) — (m) were enacted as (k) — (o) and relettered in 2005, at which time former subsections (i) and (j) were relettered as subsections (n) and (o) and internal references in subsections (a), (i), (j), (k), and (m) were conformed.

In 2007, in (b)(13) of this section, “AS

47.14.400

” was substituted for “AS 47.05.400” to reflect the 2007 renumbering on enactment of AS 47.05.400.

Cross references. —

For similar provisions relating to delinquent minors, see AS

47.12.310

.

For provision relating to applicability of paragraph (b)(16), see sec. 22(a), ch. 15, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For privacy of client records: child protection services, see 7 AAC 54, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective June 3, 2003, deleted “or to a citizen review board or local review panel for permanency planning authorized by AS

47.14.200

or

47.14.220

” from the end of paragraph (b)(1).

The 2004 amendment, effective June 26, 2004, substituted “(b)(4)” for “(b)(3)” in the first sentence of subsection (g).

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, in subsection (a) substituted “permitted” for “specified,” updated subsection references, and substituted “child” for “minor”; in subsection (b) added paragraphs (11) and (12) and otherwise rewrote the subsection; rewrote subsection (c); in subsection (f) inserted “confidential”, substituted “children” for “minors”, and deleted the last sentence; in subsection (g) inserted “confidential” and made stylistic changes; and added subsections (k) — (o) [now (i) — (m)].

The 2006 amendment, effective May 4, 2006, substituted “one or more reports” for “a report” in paragraphs (i)(1) and (i)(2), substituted “abuse or neglect” for “a report of harm under AS 47.17” and “a child who is the subject of one or more reports of harm under AS 47.17” for “that child” in paragraph (i)(3), and rewrote subsection (j).

The 2007 amendment, effective October 15, 2007, added paragraph (b)(13), and made related changes.

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, added (b)(14) and (b)(15).

The first 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, in (a), substituted “in AS

47.10.092

, (b) — (g) and (i) — (

l

) of this section, and AS

47.17.030(g)

,” for “in AS

47.10.092

and in (b) — (g) and (i) — (

l

) of this section,”; added (b)(16), and made related changes.

The second 2018 amendment, effective July 25, 2018, in (b)(12), inserted “including a variance committee established under AS

47.05.360

,” following “a review panel”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 61(b), ch. 64, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 amendments of this section have “the effect of changing Rule 22, Alaska Child in Need of Aid Rules of Procedure, by allowing the disclosure of confidential information pertaining to a child, including a child’s name or picture to be made public in certain circumstances.”

Under § 62(b), ch. 64, SLA 2005, the 2005 amendments to this section apply “to all proceedings and hearings conducted on or after July 1, 2005.”

Under § 62(c), ch. 64, SLA 2005, the 2005 amendments to this section “apply to all information, records, and files created on or after July 1, 2005; however, if a file contains information and records that were created before July 1, 2005, that information and those records retain the confidentiality that they had under the law on June 30, 2005.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

For discussion of the question of the public release of law enforcement records related to juveniles as affected by this section, see 1994 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1 (November 25, 1994).

Sec. 47.10.095.
Arrest of a minor. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 47.12.200.]

Sec. 47.10.097.
Fingerprinting of minors. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 47.12.210.]

Sec. 47.10.098.
Grievance procedure.

The department shall develop, in regulation, a grievance procedure for a parent to file a complaint based on

the application of a department policy or procedure under this chapter;

compliance with this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter; or

an act or failure to act by the department under this chapter.

The department shall prepare and distribute to each parent of a child who is under the jurisdiction of the department a written copy of the grievance procedure developed under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 28 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For grievance procedure, see 7 AAC 54.245 — 7 AAC 54.260.

For grievance procedure, see 7 AAC 54, art. 2.

Sec. 47.10.100.
Retention of jurisdiction over child.

The court retains jurisdiction over the case and may at any time stay execution, modify, set aside, revoke, or enlarge a judgment or order, or grant a new hearing, in the exercise of its power of protection over the child and for the child’s best interest, for a period of time not to exceed two years or in any event extend past the day the child reaches 19 years of age, unless sooner discharged by the court, except that the department may apply for and the court may grant an additional one-year period of custody or supervision past 19 years of age and additional one-year periods of custody that do not extend beyond the person’s 21st birthday if continued custody or supervision is in the best interests of the person and the person consents to it. An application for any of these purposes may be made by the parent, guardian, or custodian acting in behalf of the child, or the court may, on its own motion, and after reasonable notice to interested parties and the appropriate department, take action that it considers appropriate.

If the court determines at a hearing authorized by (a) of this section that the department has complied with the requirements for release of a child under AS

47.14.100(q)

and that it is in the best interests of the child to be released to the child’s own custody, or to the care or custody of the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian, it shall enter an order to that effect and the child is discharged from the control of the department.

If a child is adjudicated a child in need of aid before the child’s 18th birthday, the court may retain jurisdiction over the child after the child’s 18th birthday for the purpose of supervising the child, but the court’s jurisdiction over the minor under this chapter never extends beyond the child’s 19th birthday, except that the department may apply for and the court may grant an additional one-year period of custody or supervision past 19 years of age and additional one-year periods of custody that do not extend beyond the person’s 21st birthday if continued custody or supervision is in the best interests of the person and the person consents to it. The department may retain jurisdiction over a child if the child has been placed in the custody or under the supervision of the department before the child’s 18th birthday, except that the department may apply for and the court may grant an additional one-year period of custody or supervision past 19 years of age and additional one-year periods of custody that do not extend beyond the person’s 21st birthday if continued custody or supervision is in the best interests of the person and the person consents to it.

History.

(§ 11 art I ch 145 SLA 1957; am §§ 16, 17 ch 245 SLA 1970; am § 21 ch 63 SLA 1977; am §§ 35, 36 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 59 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 9, 2012, substituted “child” for “minor”, or similar, throughout; in (a), substituted “child reaches 19 years of age” for “minor becomes 19”, inserted “custody or” preceding “supervision” in two places, added “years of age and additional one-year periods of custody that do not extend beyond the person’s 21st birthday” following “supervision past 19”; in (b), inserted “the department has complied with the requirements for release of a child under AS

47.14.100(q)

and that” following “(a) of this section that”; in (c), twice substituted “period of custody or supervision past 19 years of age and additional one-year periods of custody that do not extend beyond the person’s 21st birthday if continued custody or supervision” for “period of supervision past age 19 if continued supervision”, deleted “between the child’s 18th and 19th birthdays for the purpose of supervising the child,” following “The department may retain jurisdiction over a child”.

Sec. 47.10.110.
Appointment of guardian or custodian.

When, in the course of a proceeding under this chapter, it appears to the court that the welfare of a minor will be promoted by the appointment of a guardian or custodian of the minor’s person, the court may make the appointment. The court shall have a summons issued and served upon the parents of the minor, if they can be found, in a manner and within a time before the hearing that the court considers reasonable. The court may determine whether the father, mother, another suitable person, or the department shall have the custody and control of the minor. If the minor is of sufficient age and intelligence to state desires, the court shall consider them.

History.

(§ 12 art I ch 145 SLA 1957; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 22 ch 63 SLA 1977; am § 37 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.10.111.
Petition for adoption or guardianship of a child in state custody.

Except as provided under AS

13.26.137(b)(2)

and AS

25.23.030(d)(2)

, if a person seeks adoption or appointment as legal guardian of a child in state custody under this chapter, the court shall hear the adoption or guardianship proceedings as part of the child-in-need-of-aid proceedings relating to the child. A person may initiate proceedings for the adoption or legal guardianship of a child in state custody under this chapter by filing with the court a petition

for adoption that meets the requirements of AS

25.23.080

; or

to be appointed legal guardian that meets the requirements of AS

13.26.147

.

If a person files a petition for adoption or legal guardianship of a child under (a) of this section before the court approves adoption or legal guardianship as the permanent plan for the child under AS

47.10.080(l)(2)

, the court shall hold the petition in abeyance until after the court has approved adoption or legal guardianship as the permanent plan for the child under AS

47.10.080(l)

.

If a person files a petition for adoption or legal guardianship of a child who is in out-of-home placement, and the child is not placed with the person who files the petition at the time the person files the petition, the department shall, not more than 60 days after the petition is filed, submit a permanent plan to the court. The court shall hold a hearing to review the permanent plan for the child under AS

47.10.080(l)

not more than 90 days after the petition is filed.

A person who files a petition for adoption or legal guardianship of a child under this section does not become a party to the child-in-need-of-aid proceedings. A person who files a petition for adoption or legal guardianship of a child under this section may only participate in proceedings under this chapter that concern the person’s petition.

A parent who has consented to adoption under AS

25.23.060

, who has relinquished parental rights under AS

47.10.089

, or whose parental rights have been terminated under AS

47.10.080(o)

or

47.10.088

, is not a party to the adoption or guardianship proceedings under this section.

Except as provided in this section, the requirements of AS 25.23 apply to a petition for adoption filed under this section, and the requirements of AS

13.26.101

—

13.26.186

apply to a petition for legal guardianship filed under this section.

History.

(§ 9 ch 6 4SSLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, cross references to renumbered sections in subsections (a) and (f) were conformed.

Cross references. —

For provision providing legislative findings and intent, see sec. 1, ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016 (HB 374) which added this section, see 2016 House Journal 974 — 976.

Effective dates. —

Section 9,
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on January 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 18,
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016, this section applies "to proceedings for adoption or legal guardianship of a child in state custody under
AS 47.10 filed on or after January 1, 2017.''

Sec. 47.10.112.
Proxy for a formal petition for adoption or legal guardianship.

A person seeking the immediate permanent placement of a child in state custody under this chapter may file a proxy for a formal petition for adoption or legal guardianship of the child. The court shall hear proceedings related to the proxy as part of the child-in-need-of-aid proceedings relating to the child. In the case of an Indian child, a proxy for a formal petition for

adoption preserves the placement preferences of 25 U.S.C. 1915(a) with respect to the person who files the proxy; and

legal guardianship preserves the placement preferences of 25 U.S.C. 1915(b) with respect to the person who files the proxy.

A proxy filed under this section does not initiate proceedings for adoption or legal guardianship. A person seeking to adopt a child in state custody must file a petition for adoption as required under AS 25.23. A person seeking to be appointed legal guardian of a child in state custody must file a petition for appointment as required under AS

13.26.101

—

13.26.186

.

If a person files a proxy for a formal petition for adoption or legal guardianship of a child who is in out-of-home placement, and the child is not placed with the person who files the proxy at the time the person files the proxy, the department shall, not more than 60 days after the proxy is filed, submit a permanent plan to the court. The court shall hold a hearing to review the permanent plan for the child under AS

47.10.080(l)

not more than 90 days after the proxy is filed.

A person who files a proxy for a formal petition for adoption or legal guardianship of a child under this section does not become a party to the child-in- need-of-aid proceedings. A person who files a proxy for a formal petition for adoption or legal guardianship may only participate in proceedings under this chapter that concern the person’s proxy.

A person who files a proxy for a formal petition for adoption or legal guardianship of a child is not entitled to the appointment of a lawyer at public expense.

A person who receives a proxy for a formal petition for adoption or legal guardianship shall file the proxy with the court.

The department may adopt regulations to implement this section.

In this section,

“extended family member”

means a person who is at least 18 years of age and who is the child’s grandparent, aunt, uncle, sibling, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, niece, nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent; or

in the case of an Indian child, has the meaning given in 25 U.S.C. 1903;

“proxy for a formal petition” or “proxy” means

a request by a person who is interested in immediate permanent placement and adoption or legal guardianship of a child, and is an extended family member, member of an Indian child’s tribe, or other Indian family member, made at any court hearing or conveyed to the department by telephone, mail, facsimile, electronic mail, or in person;

in the case of an Indian child, a request made to the department on behalf of a person described in (A) of this paragraph by

a proxy for a formal petition, as established by the department by regulation.

the Indian child’s biological parent, individually or through counsel; or

(ii)

the Indian child’s tribe, a tribe in which the Indian child is eligible for enrollment, or a tribe in which the Indian child’s biological parent is a member; or

History.

(§ 9 ch 6 4SSLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2016, in subsection (b) "AS

13.26.101

—

13.26.186

'' was substituted for "AS 13.26.030 — 13.26.085'' to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Cross references. —

For provision providing legislative findings and intent, see sec. 1, ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016 (HB 374) which added this section, see 2016 House Journal 974 — 976.

Effective dates. —

Section 9,
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect January 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 18,
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016, this section applies "to proceedings for adoption or legal guardianship of a child in state custody under
AS 47.10 filed on or after January 1, 2017.''

Sec. 47.10.113.
Civil custody proceedings.

Except as provided in AS

25.24.150(a)

, a court shall hear a request to make, modify, or vacate an order for the custody of or visitation with a minor child in state custody under this chapter as part of the child-in-need-of-aid proceedings relating to the child.

A person who files a request for an order to make, modify, or vacate an order for the custody of or visitation with a minor child in state custody under this chapter is not entitled to the appointment of a lawyer at public expense under this section.

Except as provided in this section, the requirements of AS

25.24.010

—

25.24.180

apply to a request under this section to make, modify, or vacate an order for the custody of or visitation with a minor child in state custody under this chapter.

History.

(§ 9 ch 6 4SSLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For provision providing legislative findings and intent, see sec. 1, ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016 (HB 374) which added this section, see 2016 House Journal 974 — 976.

Effective dates. —

Section 9,
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect January 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 18,
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016, this section applies "to proceedings for adoption or legal guardianship of a child in state custody under
AS 47.10 filed on or after January 1, 2017.''

Sec. 47.10.115.
Permanent fund dividend.

The department shall annually apply for a permanent fund dividend and retain in trust under AS

43.23.015(e)

for the benefit of the child the dividend and accrued interest on the dividend if the child is in the custody of the department when the application is due.

The department shall distribute the proceeds of a trust under this section

to the child when the child

has reached 21 years of age; or

is no longer in the custody of the department and has reached at least 18 years of age or is emancipated; or

when

[Repealed, § 14 ch 7 4SSLA 2016.]

ordered to do so by the court in the best interest of the child.

History.

(§ 7 ch 20 SLA 2006; am § 30 ch 53 SLA 2008; am §§
7, 14 ch 7 4SSLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 24, 2016, rewrote (b); repealed (c).

Sec. 47.10.120.
Support of child.

When a child in need of aid is committed under this chapter, the court or the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

shall, after giving the parent a reasonable opportunity to be heard, require that the parent pay to the department in a manner that the court or the child support services agency directs a sum to cover in full or in part the maintenance and care of the child. The support obligation shall be calculated under Rule 90.3(i) of the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure.

If a parent wilfully fails or refuses to pay the sum fixed, the parent may be proceeded against as provided by law in cases of family desertion and nonsupport.

The sum collected from a parent under this section shall be directly credited to the general fund of the state.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 13 art I ch 145 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 141 SLA 1959; am § 23 ch 63 SLA 1977; am §§ 88, 89 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991; am § 38 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 38 SLA 2008)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, inserted “or the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” and “or the child support services agency” in the first sentence of subsection (a), and substituted “require” for “adjudge” in that sentence.

Sec. 47.10.130.
Detention. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 47.12.240.]

Sec. 47.10.140.
Temporary detention and detention hearing. [Repealed, § 55 ch 59 SLA 1996. For current law, see AS 47.12.250.]